src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! =============== !
! Verb morphology !
! =============== !


! Tense-Mood and pointers to derivational affxes for IV and TV
! ============================================================

! Stems are first flagged according to transitivity in IV, IV_vow, TV, and TV_vow 
! Secondly they get derivatives and mood markers according to stem type
! Thirdly they get personal endings
! Fourthly they get enclitic endings
! Finally they pass through a household utensil that clears away left-over flags



LEXICON puq
# ;

LEXICON vuq
# ;

! --

LEXICON paa 
# ;

! Verbal derivational affixes
! ===========================


! Person-number affixes
! =====================

! IV
! --



! TV
! --









+1Sg+2SgO:%>  clit ;
+1Sg+3SgO:%>  clit ;
+1Sg+3DuO:%>  clit ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>  clit ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>  clit ;

+2Sg+1SgO:%>  clit ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>  clit ;
+2Sg+3DuO:%>  clit ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>  clit ;

+3Sg+1SgO:%>  clit ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>  clit ;
+3Sg+3SgO:%>  clit ;
+3Sg+3DuO:%>  clit ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>  clit ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>  clit ;
+3Sg+3PlO:%>  clit ;


+1Pl+2SgO:%>  clit ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>  clit ;
+1Pl+3DuO:%>  clit ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>  clit ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>  clit ;

+2Pl+1SgO:%>  clit ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>  clit ;
+2Pl+3DuO:%>  clit ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>  clit ;

+3Pl+1SgO:%>  clit ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>  clit ;
+3Pl+3SgO:%>  clit ;
+3Pl+3DuO:%>  clit ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>  clit ;
+3Pl+3PlO:%>  clit ;
